North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-24.1 Medical Assistance for Needy Persons

50-24.1-00.1.
Definitions. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the department of human services.

“Medical assistance” means benefits paid under chapter 50-24.1 and title XIX of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 1396 et seq.].

“Third party” means an individual, entity, or program that is or may be liable to pay all or part of the expenditures for medical assistance furnished under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 408, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-00.1.
Definitions. [Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the department of health and human services.

“Medical assistance” means benefits paid under chapter 50-24.1 and title XIX of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 1396 et seq.].

“Third party” means an individual, entity, or program that is or may be liable to pay all or part of the expenditures for medical assistance furnished under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 408, § 3, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 448, effective September 1, 2022.

50-24.1-01.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide medical care and services to persons whose income and resources are insufficient to meet such costs, and further to provide preventive, rehabilitative, and other services to help families and individuals to retain or attain capability for independence or self-care.

Source:

S.L. 1965 Sp., ch. 7, § 1.

50-24.1-01.1.
Department to submit plans and seek waivers.

The department may submit state plans and may take such actions as are reasonably necessary to administer programs under its supervision, including the issuance of policy manuals, forms, and program directives. The department may publish dashboards that demonstrate program utilization and provider care trends. Within the limits of legislative appropriation, the department may seek appropriate waivers of the requirements of the federal statutes or regulations as authorized by federal law.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 583, § 1; 2019, ch. 408, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-01.2.
Department may establish and administer state unified dental insurance coverage plan. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 481, § 1; repealed by 2019, ch. 408, § 39, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-01.3.
Department to comply with federal requirements — Interagency cooperation — Civil money penalty fund. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department shall take any action necessary to comply with the requirements of section 1919(h) of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 1396r(h)], including establishing a process to enforce compliance by nursing facilities with requirements for participation in the medical assistance program that conforms to any federal regulations implementing that section.

The state department of health and the department shall cooperate to achieve prompt and effective implementation of subsection 1.

The state treasurer shall establish a fund for the receipt of any civil money penalties imposed under subsection 1. Any civil money penalty paid to the department under subsection 1 must be deposited in that fund and, subject to the limits of legislative appropriation, may be expended for the purpose allowed by the federal government.

This section may not be construed to create any right or authorize any activity not provided for in section 1919(h) of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 1396r(h)] or its implementing federal regulations.

Before the establishment and assessment of civil money penalties permitted by section 1919(h) of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 1396r(h)], the department is encouraged to submit a plan of alternative remedies in accordance with section 1919(h)(2)(B)(ii) of that Act.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 468, § 1; 1997, ch. 445, § 2; 2019, ch. 408, § 6, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-01.3.
Department to comply with federal requirements — Interagency cooperation — Civil money penalty fund. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department shall take any action necessary to comply with the requirements of section 1919(h) of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 1396r(h)], including establishing a process to enforce compliance by nursing facilities with requirements for participation in the medical assistance program that conforms to any federal regulations implementing that section.

The state treasurer shall establish a fund for the receipt of any civil money penalties imposed under subsection 1. Any civil money penalty paid to the department under subsection 1 must be deposited in that fund and, subject to the limits of legislative appropriation, may be expended for the purpose allowed by the federal government.

This section may not be construed to create any right or authorize any activity not provided for in section 1919(h) of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 1396r(h)] or its implementing federal regulations.

Before the establishment and assessment of civil money penalties permitted by section 1919(h) of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 1396r(h)], the department is encouraged to submit a plan of alternative remedies in accordance with section 1919(h)(2)(B)(ii) of that Act.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 468, § 1; 1997, ch. 445, § 2; 2019, ch. 408, § 6, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 449, effective September 1, 2022.

50-24.1-01.4.
Medicaid and Medicare eligible individuals.

The department may not require prior authorization, additional documentation not required by Medicare, or additional prescription requirements of durable medical equipment and supplies in order to process a claim for Medicaid-eligible individuals who are also eligible for Medicare if an item has been paid by Medicare, unless the item is not covered by Medicaid.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 408, § 4, effective January 1, 2020.

50-24.1-02.
Eligibility.

Within the limits of legislative appropriations, medical assistance may be paid for any person who either has income and resources insufficient to meet the costs of necessary medical care and services or is eligible for or receiving financial assistance under chapter 50-09 or title XVI of the Social Security Act, as amended, and:

Has not at any time before or after making application for medical assistance made an assignment or transfer of property for the purpose of rendering that person eligible for assistance under this chapter. For the purposes of making any determination or redetermination of eligibility, the phrase “assignment or transfer” includes actions or failures to act which effect a renunciation or disclaimer of any interest which the applicant or recipient might otherwise assert or have asserted, or which serve to reduce the amounts which an applicant or recipient might otherwise claim from a decedent’s estate, a trust or similar device, or a person obligated by law to furnish support to the applicant or recipient.

Has applied or agrees to apply all proceeds received or receivable by that person or that person’s eligible spouse from third-party medical coverage, including health care coverage, accident insurance, and automobile insurance, to the costs of medical care for that person and that person’s eligible spouse and children. The department may require from any applicant or recipient of medical assistance the assignment of any rights accruing under third-party medical coverage. Any rights or amounts so assigned must be applied against the cost of medical care paid on behalf of the recipient under this chapter. The assignment is not effective as to any carrier before the receipt of notice of assignment by such carrier.

Is eligible under rules and regulations established by the department.

Source:

S.L. 1965 Sp., ch. 7, § 2; 1975, ch. 447, § 1; 1977, ch. 455, § 2; 1987, ch. 579, § 1; 2019, ch. 408, § 7, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-02.1.
Assignment of claim.

Each applicant or recipient of benefits under this chapter must be deemed to have assigned, to the department, any right of recovery the applicant or recipient may have for medical costs incurred under this chapter not exceeding the amount of funds expended by the department for the care and treatment of the applicant or recipient. The applicant or recipient, or other person empowered by law to act in the applicant’s or recipient’s behalf, shall execute and deliver an assignment of claim, assignment of rights, or other authorizations as necessary to secure fully the right of recovery of the department. The assignment:

Is effective as to both current and accrued medical support recovery obligations.

Takes effect upon a determination that an applicant is eligible for assistance under this chapter.

The department may compromise claims arising out of assignments made under this section on such terms as it may deem just and appropriate. The department may not be compelled to compromise any claim.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 455, § 1; 1981, ch. 492, § 1; 2009, ch. 419, § 16; 2019, ch. 408, § 8, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 16 of chapter 419, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

50-24.1-02.2.
Community spouse resource allowance.

In determining eligibility for medical assistance applicants and recipients, the department shall establish a community spouse resource allowance equal to the maximum community spouse resource allowance as provided by 42 U.S.C. 1396r-5(f)(2). This section applies to a community spouse of an institutionalized spouse. For purposes of this section, “institutionalized spouse” includes an individual who is described in 42 U.S.C. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(VI).

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 493, § 1; 1989, ch. 583, § 2; 1991, ch. 29, § 15; 1997, ch. 12, § 13; 2019, ch. 408, § 9, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-02.3.
When designated pre-need funeral service contracts, prepayments, or deposits not to be considered in eligibility determination.

In determining eligibility for medical assistance, the department may not consider as an available resource any pre-need funeral service contracts, prepayments, or deposits to a fund which are placed in an irrevocable itemized funeral contract designated by the applicant or recipient to pay for the applicant’s or recipient’s funeral.

An applicant or recipient designates a prepayment or deposit for that applicant’s or recipient’s burial by providing funds that must be used for the funeral or burial expenses of the applicant or recipient. If an applicant’s or recipient’s burial is funded by an insurance policy, the amount considered set-aside for burial is the lesser of the cost basis or the face value of the insurance policy. Interest or earnings retained in a funeral fund also may not be considered as an available resource.

A pre-need funeral service contract, prepayment, or deposit designated under this section is not a multiple-party account for purposes of chapter 30.1-31. Any amount in a pre-need funeral service contract, prepayment, or deposit designated under this section which is not used for funeral or burial expenses must be returned to the estate of the medical assistance recipient and is subject to recovery by the department from the medical assistance recipient’s estate. A claim for payment of funeral expenses may not be made against the estate of a deceased medical assistance recipient except to the extent the funds are maintained in accordance with this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 494, § 1; 1987, ch. 580, § 1; 1989, ch. 304, § 2; 1991, ch. 512, § 1; 1995, ch. 461, § 7; 1997, ch. 412, § 1; 1999, ch. 426, § 1; 2005, ch. 420, § 1; 2009, ch. 427, § 1; 2011, ch. 363, § 1; 2013, ch. 377, § 2; 2019, ch. 408, § 10, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 409, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 377, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 363, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 427, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

Note.

Section 50-24.1-02.3 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 10 of Chapter 408, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1115; and Section 2 of Chapter 409, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1318.

50-24.1-02.4.
Exempt income and resources.

The department may not consider, as an available asset for purposes of determining eligibility for benefits under this chapter, income and resources set aside by a blind or disabled person as part of a plan to achieve self-support, if the plan has been approved by the social security administration.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 482, § 1.

50-24.1-02.5.
Effect of purchase of insurance on disqualifying transfer.

An individual who secures and maintains insurance that covers the cost of substantially all necessary medical care, including necessary care in a nursing home and necessary care for an individual who qualifies for admission to a nursing home but receives care elsewhere, for at least thirty-six months after the date an asset is disposed of, may demonstrate that the asset was disposed of exclusively for a purpose other than to qualify for medical assistance by providing proof of that insurance.

If purchased after July 31, 2003, the insurance coverage under this section must include home health care coverage, assisted living coverage, basic care coverage, and skilled nursing facility coverage. The coverage required under this subsection must include a daily benefit equal to at least one and fifty-seven hundredths times the average daily cost of nursing care for the year in which the policy was issued and an aggregate benefit equal to at least one thousand ninety-five times that daily benefit.

This section applies only to policies purchased before the effective date of an approved amendment to the state plan for medical assistance that provides for a qualified state long-term care insurance partnership under section 1917(b) of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 1396 p].

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 469, § 1; 2003, ch. 420, § 1; 2007, ch. 421, § 1; 2019, ch. 408, § 11, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 421, S.L. 2007 became effective March 2, 2007, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 4 of chapter 421, S.L. 2007.

50-24.1-02.6.
Medical assistance benefits — Eligibility criteria.

The department shall provide medical assistance benefits to otherwise eligible persons who aremedically needy persons who have countable income that does not exceed an amount determined under subsection 2.

The department shall establish an income level for medically needy persons at an amount no less than required by federal law.

The department shall provide medical assistance benefits to children and families coverage groups and pregnant women without consideration of assets.

The department may require, as a condition of eligibility, individuals eligible for Medicare part A, B, or D to apply for such coverage.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 246, § 30; 2001, ch. 425, § 1; 2003, ch. 421, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 422, § 1; 2009, ch. 12, § 20; 2019, ch. 408, § 12, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 20 of chapter 12, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

50-24.1-02.7.
Workers with disabilities coverage.

The department shall establish and implement a buyin program to provide medical assistance to an individual who, except for substantial gainful activity, meets the definition of disabled under the supplemental security income program under title XVI of the federal Social Security Act, who is at least sixteen but less than sixty-five years of age, and who is gainfully employed. The program:

Must be made available to an individual with a disability who is a member of a household with a net income less than two hundred twenty-five percent of the most recently revised official poverty line published by the federal office of management and budget applicable to the household size;

Must allow up to an additional ten thousand dollars in assets;

Must require the payment of a premium that is based upon a sliding scale which may not be less than two and one-half percent nor more than seven and one-half percent of the individual’s gross countable income;

Must include a one-time program enrollment fee of one hundred dollars;

Must provide that the failure of an enrolled individual to pay premiums for three months may result in the termination of enrollment in the program; and

May not require the payment of a premium or enrollment fee or disenroll an individual for failure to pay a premium or enrollment fee for workers with disabilities coverage during a federally declared emergency if collection of the premium or enrollment fee may impact the receipt of federal funds.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 422, § 1; 2005, ch. 421, § 1; 2019, ch. 408, § 13, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 12, § 30, effective May 10, 2021.

50-24.1-02.8.
Transfers involving annuities.

For purposes of this section, “annuity” means a policy, certificate, contract, or other arrangement between two or more parties under which one party pays money or other valuable consideration to the other party in return for the right to receive payments in the future.

The purchase of an annuity on or after February 8, 2006, or the selection or alteration on or after February 8, 2006, of a payment option for an annuity purchased at any time, is a disqualifying transfer of an asset for purposes of this chapter unless:

The state is named as the remainder beneficiary in the first position for at least the total amount of medical assistance paid on behalf of the annuitant or the state is named in the second position after the community spouse or minor or disabled child and is named in the first position if the community spouse or a representative of the minor or disabled child disposes of any remainder for less than fair market value;

The annuity is purchased from an insurance company or other commercial company that sells annuities as part of the normal course of business;

The annuity is irrevocable and neither the annuity nor payments due under the annuity may be assigned or transferred;

The annuity provides substantially equal monthly payments of principal and interest and does not have a balloon or deferred payment of principal or interest. Payments will be considered substantially equal if the total annual payment in any year varies by five percent or less from the payment in the previous year; and

The annuity will return the full principal and interest within the purchaser’s life expectancy as determined in accordance with actuarial publications of the office of the chief actuary of the social security administration.

Except for the provision in subdivision a of subsection 2, this section does not apply to:

An annuity described in subsection b or q of section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; or

An annuity purchased with proceeds from:

An account or trust described in subsection a, c, or p of section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;

A simplified employee pension within the meaning of subsection k of section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; or

A Roth IRA described in section 408 A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 423, § 1; 2005, ch. 423, § 1; 2005, ch. 422, § 1; 2007, ch. 423, § 1; 2019, ch. 408, § 14, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 423, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

50-24.1-02.9.
Effect of purchase of long-term care insurance on eligibility for medical assistance benefits. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 421, § 3.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 421, S.L. 2007 became effective March 2, 2007, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 4 of chapter 421, S.L. 2007.

50-24.1-02.10.
Real estate taxes on rental property as deduction from rental income.

For purposes of determining the treatment of income and the application of income to the cost of care for medical assistance eligibility for an individual screened as requiring nursing care services, and who is receiving home and community-based services or nursing care services, the department shall allow as a deduction from countable gross rental income the real estate taxes for rental property if the individual is responsible for paying the real estate taxes for that property.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 364, § 1; 2019, ch. 408, § 15, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2011.

50-24.1-03.
County share of medical assistance — Reimbursement for clinic services not required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 13.

50-24.1-03.1.
Duties of human service zone and department.

In the administration of the medical assistance program, the department or a human service zone shall investigate and record the circumstances of each applicant or recipient of assistance, in order to ascertain the facts supporting the application, or the granting of assistance, and obtain such other information as directed by the department or as may be required by the rules and regulations of the department.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 492, § 4; 2007, ch. 417, § 12; 2019, ch. 408, § 16, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 391, § 113, effective January 1, 2020.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 12 of chapter 417, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

Note.

Section 50-24.1-03.1 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 113 of Chapter 391, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2124; and Section 16 of Chapter 408, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1115.

50-24.1-03.2.
Investigations — Power of human service zones, department, and employees.

In the investigation of applications under the provisions of this chapter, the human service zones, the department, and the officials and employees of such agencies charged with the administration and enforcement of this chapter may:

Conduct examinations;

Require the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records, and papers; and

Make application to the district court of the county to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records, and papers.

The department may request from other state, county, human service zones, and local agencies information deemed necessary to carry out the medical support enforcement program. All officers and employees of state, county, and local agencies shall cooperate with the department in locating absent spouses or parents of children to whom an obligation of support is owed or on whose behalf assistance is being provided and, on request, shall supply the department with available information relative to the location, income, social security number, and property holdings of the absent spouse or parent, notwithstanding any provision of law making that information confidential. Any person acting under the authority of the department who, pursuant to this subsection, obtains information from the office of the state tax commissioner, the confidentiality of which is protected by law, may not divulge such information except to the extent necessary for the administration of the medical support enforcement program or when otherwise directed by judicial order or when otherwise provided by law.

The officers and employees designated by the human service zones or the department may administer oaths and affirmations.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 492, § 3; 2007, ch. 417, § 13; 2019, ch. 391, § 114, effective January 1, 2020; 2019, ch. 408, § 17, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 13 of chapter 417, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

Note.

Section 50-24.1-03.2 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 114 of Chapter 391, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2124; and Section 17 of Chapter 408, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1115.

50-24.1-03.3.
Criminal background investigation — Fingerprinting required.

When the department determines a criminal history record check is appropriate, a provider applicant, a provider, or an individual with a five percent or more direct or indirect ownership interest in the provider applicant or provider shall secure, from any agency authorized to take fingerprints, two sets of fingerprints and shall provide all other information necessary to secure state criminal history record information and a nationwide background check under federal law.

The applicant provider or provider shall assure the information obtained under subsection 1 is provided to the department within thirty days of the notice date.

The department shall submit the information and fingerprints to the bureau of criminal investigation to determine if there is any criminal history record information regarding the applicant provider, provider, or an individual with a five percent or more direct or indirect ownership interest in the provider applicant or provider in accordance with section 12-60-24.

The bureau of criminal investigation shall request a nationwide background check from the federal bureau of investigation and, upon receipt of response, provide the response of the federal bureau of investigation to the department. The bureau also shall provide any criminal history record information that lawfully may be made available under chapter 12-60 to the department.

The results of the investigations must be forwarded to the department.

Upon request by the applicant provider, provider, or an individual with a five percent or more direct or indirect ownership interest in the provider applicant or provider, a law enforcement agency shall take fingerprints of individuals described in this section if the request is made for purposes of this section.

The applicant provider, provider, or an individual with a five percent or more direct or indirect ownership interest in the provider applicant or provider shall pay the cost of securing fingerprints, any criminal history record information made available under chapter 12-60, and a nationwide background check.

The department may charge a fee not to exceed the actual cost for the purpose of processing the background investigations.

An agency that takes fingerprints as provided under this section may charge a reasonable fee to offset the cost of the fingerprinting.

The department may use the background information findings to determine approval of Medicaid services provider application or termination of enrollment as a Medicaid services provider. An individual denied or terminated as a Medicaid service provider as a result of the background investigation may not be qualified to enroll as a provider, have five percent or greater ownership or control interest in a Medicaid services provider, or submit claims for reimbursement through the department’s Medicaid management information system.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 346, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 408, § 18, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-04.
Authority of department.

The department may adopt rules and regulations as necessary to qualify for any federal funds available under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1965 Sp., ch. 7, § 4; 2019, ch. 408, § 19, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-05.
Date effective.

The effective date of this chapter is the date on which federal funds become available for the purposes and program outlined herein.

Source:

S.L. 1965 Sp., ch. 7, § 5.

50-24.1-06.
Remedial eye care — When provided. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 447, § 2; 2003, ch. 424, § 1; repealed by 2021, ch. 371, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.

50-24.1-07.
Recovery from estate of medical assistance recipient.

On the death of any recipient of medical assistance who was a resident of a nursing facility, intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities, or other medical institution and with respect to whom the department determined that resident reasonably was not expected to be discharged from the medical institution and to return home, or who was fifty-five years of age or older when the recipient received the assistance, and on the death of the spouse of the deceased recipient, the total amount of medical assistance paid on behalf of the recipient following the institutionalization of the recipient who cannot reasonably be expected to be discharged from the medical institution, or following the recipient’s fifty-fifth birthday, as the case may be, must be allowed as a preferred claim against the decedent’s estate after payment, in the following order, of:

Recipient liability expense applicable to the month of death for nursing home or basic care services;

Funeral expenses not in excess of three thousand dollars;

Expenses of the last illness, other than those incurred by medical assistance;

Expenses of administering the estate, including attorney’s fees approved by the court;

Claims made under chapter 50-01;

Claims made under chapter 50-24.5;

Claims made under chapter 50-06.3 and on behalf of the state hospital; and

Claims made under subsection 4.

A claim may not be required to be paid nor may interest begin to accrue during the lifetime of the decedent’s surviving spouse, if any, nor while there is a surviving child who is under the age of twenty-one years or is blind or permanently and totally disabled, but no timely filed claim may be disallowed because of the provisions of this section.

The department may not file a claim against an estate to recover payments made on behalf of a recipient who was eligible for Medicaid under section 50-24.1-37 and who received coverage through a private carrier.

Every personal representative, upon the granting of letters of administration or testamentary shall forward to the department a copy of the petition or application commencing probate, heirship proceedings, or joint tenancy tax clearance proceedings in the respective district court, together with a list of the names of the legatees, devisees, surviving joint tenants, and heirs at law of the estate. Unless a properly filed claim of the department is paid in full, the personal representative shall provide to the department a statement of assets and disbursements in the estate.

A claim of the department made against the decedent’s estate of a recipient of medical assistance who was a full-benefit dual-eligible recipient, or against the decedent’s estate of the spouse of a deceased recipient of medical assistance who was a full-benefit dual-eligible recipient, must include a claim for an amount equal to the amount required to be paid each month under 42 U.S.C. 1396u-5(c)(1)(A), or a substantially similar federal law, which reasonably may be attributable to benefits paid on behalf of the deceased recipient in a month during which the deceased recipient received medical assistance under this chapter and was eligible for Medicare.

All assets in the decedent’s estate of the spouse of a deceased medical assistance recipient are presumed to be assets in which that recipient had an interest at the time of the recipient’s death.

To the extent a claim for repayment of medical assistance arises for services provided in months during which the department has in effect an approved state plan amendment that provides for the disregard of assets in an amount equal to the insurance benefit payments that are made to or on behalf of an individual who is a beneficiary of an insurance policy under a qualified state long-term care insurance partnership, the department’s claim need not be paid out of assets of the decedent’s estate of a recipient of medical assistance, or assets of the decedent’s estate of the spouse of such a recipient, of a value equal to an amount the estate demonstrates was paid for long-term care provided to the recipient of medical assistance during those months by that insurance policy.

For purposes of this section:

“Full-benefit dual-eligible” has the meaning provided in 42 U.S.C. 1396 u-5; and

“Qualified state long-term care insurance partnership” has the meaning provided in 42 U.S.C. 1396 p(b).

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 447, § 3; 1977, ch. 454, § 2; 1979, ch. 512, § 2; 1981, ch. 492, § 2; 1981, ch. 496, § 1; 1991, ch. 326, § 180; 1995, ch. 461, § 8; 1997, ch. 412, § 2; 2005, ch. 424, § 1; 2007, ch. 421, § 2; 2007, ch. 424, § 1; 2009, ch. 428, § 1; 2011, ch. 365, § 1; 2011, ch. 207, § 22; 2013, ch. 378, § 1; 2015, ch. 333, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 408, § 20, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 333, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 378, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 365, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 22 of chapter 207, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 428, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 424, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 421, S.L. 2007 became effective March 2, 2007, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 4 of chapter 421, S.L. 2007.

50-24.1-08.
Statute of limitations does not run.

The statute of limitations does not run against claims of the state of North Dakota for repayment of medical assistance provided under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 447, § 4.

50-24.1-09.
Reimbursement of long-term care facility — Limitation — Allowable costs. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 582, § 30.

50-24.1-10.
Joint Medicaid payment account — Educationally related services. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 11, § 4; repealed by 2019, ch. 408, § 39, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-11.
Joint Medicaid payment account — North Dakota vision services — school for the blind. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 68, § 6; 2001, ch. 257, § 6; repealed by 2019, ch. 408, § 39, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-12.
Medical assistance — Services provided by psychologists.

Within the limits of legislative appropriations, the department shall provide medical assistance to eligible recipients for services provided by psychologists licensed under chapter 43-32.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 513, § 1; 2019, ch. 408, § 21, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-13.
Provider reimbursement rates. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 246, § 31; repealed by 2019, ch. 408, § 39, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-14.
Responsibility for expenditures.

Notwithstanding section 50-24.1-34, expenditures required under this chapter are the responsibility of the federal government or the state of North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 11; 2015, ch. 329, § 8, effective January 1, 2016; 2019, ch. 408, § 22, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-15.
Prehospital emergency medical services.

Medical assistance coverage must include prehospital emergency medical services benefits in the case of a medical condition that manifests itself by symptoms of sufficient severity which may include severe pain and which a prudent layperson who possesses an average knowledge of health and medicine could reasonably expect the absence of medical attention to result in placing the person’s health in jeopardy, serious impairment of a bodily function, or serious dysfunction of any body part. A medical assistance claim that meets the prudent layperson standard of this section may not be denied by the department on the basis that the prehospital emergency medical services were not medically necessary or that a medical emergency did not exist.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 427, § 2; 2005, ch. 425, § 1.

50-24.1-16.
Reimbursement of ambulance services.

Medical assistance coverage must include reimbursement of ambulance services for responding to calls to assist covered individuals which do not result in transport.

For purposes of classifying ambulance services under this section:

An emergency response is one that at the time the ambulance is called the ambulance responds immediately. An immediate response is one in which the ambulance begins as quickly as possible to take the steps necessary to respond to the call.

An advanced life support assessment is an assessment performed by an advanced life support crew as part of an emergency response that was necessary because the patient’s reported condition at the time of the dispatch was such that only an advanced life support crew was qualified to perform the assessment. An advanced life support assessment does not necessarily result in a determination that the patient requires an advanced life support level of service.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 247, § 3; 2015, ch. 193, § 3, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 408, § 23, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 193, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

50-24.1-16.1.
Continuous glucose monitoring devices.

Medical assistance coverage, including Medicaid Expansion, must include coverage of a continuous glucose monitoring device for a covered individual.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 370, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

50-24.1-17.
Medical assistance for breast or cervical cancer.

The department may provide medical assistance for individuals screened and found to have breast or cervical cancer in accordance with the federal Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Act of 2000 [Pub. L. 106-354; 114 Stat. 1381; 42 U.S.C. 1396 a et seq.]. The department shall establish an income eligibility limit that may not exceed two hundred percent of the most recently revised poverty line published by the federal office of management and budget applicable to the household size.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 426, § 1; 2003, ch. 425, § 1; 2019, ch. 408, § 24, effective July 1, 2019.